North Carolina statutes. Chapter 53. Regulation of Financial Services.
Article 9. Bank Examiners. [Repealed]

§§ 53-117 through 53-123.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

History.

S. 53-117; 1921, c. 4, s. 72; C.S., s. 223(a); 1931, c. 243, s. 5; 1967, c. 789, s. 17; 1977, c. 684, s. 1; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1181, s. 1; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-118; 1921, c. 4, s. 73; C.S., s. 223(b); 1931, c. 243, s. 5; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-119; 1921, c. 4, s. 74; C.S., s. 223(c); 1931, c. 243, s. 5; 1939, c. 91, s. 2; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-120; 1921, c. 4, s. 75; C.S., s. 223(d); repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-121; 1921, c. 4, s. 76; C.S., s. 223(e); 1931, c. 243, s. 5; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1037, s. 91; repealed by 2012-56. s.1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-122; 1921, c. 4, s. 77; C.S., s. 223(f); 1927, c. 47, s. 15; 1931, c. 243, s. 5; 1943, c. 733; 1945, c. 467; 1955, c. 640, ss. 1, 2; 1957, c. 1443, s. 1; 1969, c. 229; 1979, c. 483, s. 1; 1981, c. 671, s. 13; 1989, c. 561, s. 1; 1997-285, s. 1; 2007-55, s. 1; 2009-451, s. 14.20; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-123; 1921, c. 4, s. 78; C.S., s. 223(g); 1931, c. 243, s. 5; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.